Vermont statutes. Title 2 Legislature
Chapter 18. Joint Information Technology Oversight Committee

§§ 611-613.
Repealed. 1993, No. 207 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 1996.

§ 614.
Joint Information Technology Oversight Committee.

Creation. There is created the Joint Information Technology Oversight Committee to oversee investments in and use of information technology in Vermont and to provide periodic advice on legislative information technology issues.

Membership. The Committee shall be composed of six members as follows:

three members of the House of Representatives, not all of whom shall be from the same political party, who shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House; and

three members of the Senate, not all of whom shall be from the same political party, who shall be appointed by the Committee on Committees.

Powers and duties.

The Committee shall oversee, evaluate, and make recommendations on the following:

the State’s current deployment, management, and oversight of information technology in the furtherance of State governmental activities, including data processing systems, telecommunications networks, and related technologies, particularly with regard to issues of compatibility among existing and proposed technologies;

issues related to the storage of, maintenance of, access to, privacy of, and restrictions on use of computerized records;

issues of public policy related to the development and promotion of the private, commercial, and nonprofit information infrastructure in the State, its relationship to the State government information infrastructure, and its integration with national and international information networks; and

cybersecurity.

The Committee may provide advice to the Director of Legislative Information Technology and the Joint Legislative Management Committee as appropriate regarding matters related to legislative information technology.

Assistance. The Committee shall have the administrative, technical, and legal assistance of the Office of Legislative Counsel, the Office of Legislative Operations, and the Joint Fiscal Office.

Meetings.

The Committee shall elect a chair and vice chair from among its members and shall adopt rules of procedure. The Chair shall rotate biennially between the House and Senate members.

A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.

The Committee may meet when the General Assembly is not in session or at the call of the Chair.

Reimbursement. For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General Assembly, members of the Committee shall be entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to section 23 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 187

(Adj. Sess.), § 8a, eff. May 28, 2018; amended

2018, No. 11

(Sp. Sess.), § E.126.2;

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.